Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201781-3724
Tax Commissioner; adopt rules and regulations.

The Tax Commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the collection of lodging taxes under the Nebraska Visitors Development Act.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 18;

Laws 1988, LB 797, § 9;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 81-1262;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 24;

Laws 2017, LB222, § 11.
August 24, 2017